Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2610
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 240.